Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.220.037

Traffic safety education program—Development and administration of certification process—Program audits—Suspension of program certification—Duties of department of licensing.

(1) The department of licensing shall develop and administer the certification process required under RCW 28A.220.030 for a school district's or approved private school's traffic safety education program in consultation with the superintendent.

(2) The department of licensing shall conduct audits of traffic safety education programs to ensure that the instructors are qualified teachers of driver training education and teaching the required curriculum material, and that accurate records are maintained and accurate information is provided to the department of licensing regarding student performance. Each school district and approved private school may be audited at least once every five years or more frequently. The audit process must take into account the unique nature of school district facilities, operations, and hours. As part of its audit process, the department of licensing may examine all relevant information, including driver training education course curriculum materials and student records, and visit any course in progress that is part of the traffic safety education program. The director shall consult with the superintendent in developing and carrying out these auditing practices.

(3) The department of licensing may suspend a school's or school district's traffic safety education program certification if: The school or school district does not follow the curriculum promulgated by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the department of licensing, any program instructors are not qualified teachers of driver training education, accurate records have not been maintained under RCW 28A.220.030(5) or accurate information regarding student performance has not been provided to the department of licensing, or the school or school district refuses to cooperate with the department of licensing audit process authorized under this chapter. The director shall consult with the superintendent in developing and carrying out these program certification suspension practices.

[ 2017 c 197 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 c 197: See notes following RCW 28A.220.020.